Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 283. PANOLA COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER C. MURVAUL LAKE

Sec. 283.021. CAMPING. No person may camp on the shores of Murvaul Lake in Panola County on land owned by the Panola County Fresh Water Supply District Number 1 except at places designated as campsites by the Board of Supervisors of the Panola County Fresh Water Supply District Number 1.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 283.022. FIREARMS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b) of this section, no person may possess for shooting a rifle or pistol of any kind on or over the water of Murvaul Lake in Panola County.

(b) This section does not apply to a peace officer or game warden of this state or to a regular employee of the Panola County Fresh Water Supply District Number 1.

(c) Possession of a rifle or pistol of any kind within 500 feet from the water of Murvaul Lake is prima facie evidence of a violation of this section.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 78 (H.B. 1346), Sec. 7, eff. May 19, 2011.

Sec. 283.023. CERTAIN WATER SPORTS ON LAKE MURVAUL. No person may swim, bathe, wade, or water ski in or on Lake Murvaul except within areas designated by the Board of Supervisors of the Panola County Fresh Water Supply District No. 1 as areas for swimming, bathing, wading, or water skiing.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.